Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-605.01
Death certificate; death in military service outside continental limits of United States; recording.

Death certificates issued by or under the authority of the United States for persons who were residents of Nebraska at the time they entered the military or armed forces of the United States, and died while in the service of their country while outside the continental limits of the United States may be recorded with the department.

Laws 1947, c. 233, § 1, p. 739;

Laws 1949, c. 203, § 1, p. 588;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 518;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 406.